tables/hyph_brl_da_dk.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 1
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 1
.a2a
.a4b5s2
.a1b2
.a6d3s
.a1d
.a2e
.a4f1
.a1g4r4
.agte2r1
.a2gt
.ag1te
.a2k2j
.a3k2v
.a2l2a2m
.a1la
.a2l5d6
.a2m3p4
.2a2m
.a6m1s2
.a3n2a
.an3d2e
.a4n1d
.an3d2o
.an5d6r2
.a2ner
.a1ne
.an5s2k
.a6n2s
.an3s2t
.ari5s4
.2a1ri
.a5s2e3
.a1s
.a2ska
.a5s1k4l2
.a3s2ko
.as2k3u
.a4s3p2l2
.a3s4p4
.a4s1t3h4
.a3st
.as2ti
.a3t2a
.a1t
.2a4v5s
.a1v
.1b4
.be3la
.5be
.be2nen
.be1ne
.be3ra
.be3ro
.3b4la2
.bl2
.bog7sk
.5bo
.bo2g5s1
.bre6d5s
.3b4r4
.b1re
.bre1d
.b2ri2n2t2
.b1ri
.1c4
.c4h6
.cle2a
.c1le
.co3c4h4
.co1c2
.1d6
.d2a2gel
.da1ge
.dag5st
.d2a2g4s1
.d2e2j3s
.3de
.de5nda
.1de4n1d
.de2r1i.
.de1ri
.de2r1i1b2
.de2rig
.de2ri1m
.de1r3u
.di3o
.3di
.do5r2i
.e4a
.e4b5s1
.2e1b2
.e5di
.e1d
.e2e
.e2f3l2
.e1f
.e4fu
.e2g1n4
.e1g
.e2i
.ek4s3il
.e6k1s
.ek3si
.ek6s1te
.ek3st
.e2l1s2
.e2n1a1b2
.e1na
.e3n2e
.en2g5s2
.e2ng
.en4sto
.e6n2s
.en3st
.2e3nu
.e2næ
.e2n1ø
.e1r4a
.e3ran
.e2r5ar
.e3r2i
.e4sc4h4
.e2s
.e3s2c2
.e5s4t3h4
.e3st
.e3tu
.e2tå
.e2u1
.e1w2
.1f4
.f2a2g5s1
.3f2a
.fo6n6s
.3f2o
.g4
.ga4si
.1ga
.3ga1s
.ga4sk
.ga4sta
.ga3st
.ge2e
.1ge
.ge5n2o2m
.3gen
.g2e2no
.ge3ro
.ge3ru
.ge2s2
.ge4s2n4
.ge5s6v2
.ghe3
.2g1h4
.gu4del
.1gu
.gu2d
.g2u3de
.1h6
.he6d7s3
.3he1d4
.he2r1i.
.he1ri
.hi2n
.hu6d1e4n1d
.3hu
.hu4d
.h2u5de
.hu5sto
.hu4s1t
.hu2s
.i3a
.i3d2
.i1g4r4
.i3k1l2
.2in4d3r2
.i4n1d
.ind5re6t.
.ind3re
.ind4ret
.in6d5s2
.i2ne
.i6n5s
.i1ri4
.2ir
.i5sa
.i1s
.i6s1ag
.i4s1k
.i5sk2ar
.i3s2o
.i4st
.i5sta
.i6ster
.i5ste
.is1to
.is3t2y
.i1t4
.i3t2h4
.i1ø
.j2
.k4
.ka2b3let
.2ka1b2
.3kabl2
.1kab1le
.ka3lu
.ke3ti
.3ko1o
.1ko
.l4
.lati2
.la1t
.la4ven
.la1v
.la3ve
.le2t
.1le
.l2e1t3r4
.li3g2e
.1li
.2lo3p2h4
.lo2p
.lu2s4
.lø2g5s1
.1lø
.lø2n3
.1m4
.me4d1ej
.3me
.me1d
.me3de
.me4d5r2
.me2e
.2m1f1
.mi1e
.3mi
.m2i4s1
.må2l5s
.n2
.4n3d
.ne4d3r2
.1ne
.ne1d
.ne6d2s2
.n2e2g3r4
.ne1g
.ne3r2u
.ne2t2i
.ne2t1o2p
.n2e1to
.n2e2t3r4
.n4å
.ode2l1s3
.o1d
.o3de
.o2en
.o1e
.o4m3
.o6men
.o3me
.o6m1s4
.2o4pa
.o2p
.o4p2h4
.o4p5l2
.o4p5r2
.2o3p4ra
.o4p1s2
.o1r2a
.ora2l
.or2d5ret
.o2r1d
.ord4r2
.ord3re
.o3re
.o3ro
.2o2r3t4
.o3ve4
.o1v
.over1
.1p6
.pe3te2
.3pe
.5pet
.phe3
.p2h4
.po3l2a2
.3po
.5pol
.r4
.ra2b3l2
.ra1b2
.2ra2f3
.re6d5s4
.1re
.re1d
.ri1e.
.1ri
.ri2g8s5
.ri6k4s3
.ri4s1a
.ri1s
.ris1k
.ri2s3ko1s
.ris2ko
.ri4s4p4
.ru6m3s
.ru2m
.run4d2r2
.ru4n1d
.rus4k
.ru2s
.ru5s1ko
.ru4sta
.ru3st
.1s6
.se3r2a
.5s2e
.se3ro
.1se5s2
.si1et
.3si
.5sie
.1sin6d4s
.2si4n1d
.sk4
.2s1o3p4
.3st4
.sta4b3l2
.sta1b2
.1sto2r1i1s
.sto1ri
.t6
.ta2get
.t2ag
.1ta1ge
.t2an6d3s
.ta4n1d
.te3e6n.
.te1e
.te2e2n
.te6k4s
.te2m1p4
.te2m
.tem3p2l2
.t2e3n2o
.ti3e
.t2i2l1
.tin2g5s1
.t2i2ng
.ti5s4t
.ti1s
.to5me
.to2m
.to6n6s
.to3ri
.to3ro
.1træ5s
.t2r4
.6t2s2
.tvi7s
.2t1v
.tv2i
.tø2r
.u1b4
.u4da
.u2d
.u4d1i
.2u4do
.u6d5s4
.u3f2o2
.u2f
.u3i
.un3d4r2
.u4n1d
.u3o
.u3re
.u4rel
.2u3ri
.u3r1o1v
.u1ro
.u1rå
.u3s4
.ute3
.u1t
.u3t1v
.1v2
.5v3e.
.3ve
.v3e4g.
.ve1g
.v3e2i.
.ve1i
.v3e2j.
.5vej
.v3eje.
.ve1je
.ve2l3
.v2e3no
.ve3re
.vi2nel
.v2i
.vi1ne
.vra2
.2v1r2
.væ2g
.3væ
.w2
.x4
.xe3
.y2a
.y2d2r2
.y1d
.y2e
.2y5s
.2y3v
.æ3d5r2
.æ1d
.æ2ge
.æ2g5s2
.æ4n1d4
.æ2ng5
.æ1r1a
.ær2e4st
.æ1re
.ære2s
.æ5r2i
.æ1r2ø
.ø2s4
.å2rø
a1a2f
aa3h6
a1ak
aa1l2u
2a1a2n3m
a3a1ri
2abe1c2
a1b2
a5be
2abel
2abe1v
ab3len
abl2
ab1le
ab3s4i
a4b1s1
ab6s5k
ab5sto
ab4st2
a2c3l
a1c2
a3cy3
acyk2
ada2r
a1d
ad2a4ra
1ad3di
a4d5d2
a4d1ele3ne2s2
a3de
ade1le
adele1ne
a4d1eli1t
ade1li
adel5sta
adel4st
ade2l1s
ade3re
1a2d3g4
2a3di
adi4o
adi4s2t
adi1s
2a2d5l
adli4n6e.
ad1li
adli1ne
1a4d5m
ad4r2
adra2s
a3dra
a2d5r2e.
ad3re
a1d5re1d
ad5rer
ad5ret
a5d1ri
a3d5ro
ad6s1k2j
a6d2s
ad3sk4
ad6s1ko
ad4sk2r4
ad3s2m
ad6so
ad2s3p4
ad4s1ta
ad3st
ad5s1t2j
ad5sø
ad1un3
a4d1u4n1d6
2a2d1w
a2d1øl
a3d2ø6l.
a1e
a2e.
a2e1c2
a2e1d
a2ek
a2e2m
a2e3n2o
ae3r2o
a2e2s2
ae3t4h4
a2f
2a3f2a
a4f3an
a4f3a4r3b2
3a2f1d4
2a3fe
1af3f2a
a2f1f
1af3fy
1af3fæ
1a2f3g2
1a2f1h4
2a3fi
afi6k5s2
af3j
af3l2
1aflu
1af1lø
2a5f2o
1a3f2r2
af3re
2a3f4ro
af3ru
1a2f3s2
2af6s3s2
2af6t.
a2f1t
3afta
af2tek
1aft2r4
af6t5s4
af3tv2i
af2t1v
3a2f5v
2a4g.
2a1ga
a2g1ak
agar1
a3ga3s
2a2g1d2
2agel
a1ge
age3na
a3gen
ag2e2n2o
age5no2m
agen4s1k
age6n2s
age2r1an
age1ra
ag1i1d
a1gi
2ag1l
2a1go
a2g1o2m
ag1o1v
2agra2m1m
a1g2r4
agr2a4m
ag3re
ag3ri
a3gru
2a2g4s1
ag6sku
ag3sp2r2
ag2s3p4
ag5ste3e
ags2te
ag3st
ag6sy
ag5s2å
2ag6t.
a2gt
ag1t2a
ag3tet4
ag1te
1ag1ti
ag2to
ag2t2r4
agt5s5f
ag6t2s
a2g3u2d
a1gu
a2gy
2a1gæ
ag1ør
a1gø
ah5ra
a1h4
a2hr
a2h5v
ai3c2
aig6
ai3g4r4
a1ii3
a3i4k.
a2i2k5r4
aille4s
a2il
ail1l
ail3l2e
a1in
a2i2na
a2i3n2er
ai1ne
ain1e3v2
a1i1v
a1ja
a2j1ar
a1ji
a1jo
aj2s3k
a2j1s
aj6so
a1ju
a1ka
1aka1d
aka2lo
a1ke
a2k1ek
ake2t3
a3k2i
a1k2j
1ak1ko
a4k5k4
a2kl2
ak1la
a3k2le2s
a2k1le
a3k2li
a3klo
ak1læ
2a3ko
a4k1o2f
a3k1o2gl
ak2o2p
a1k2r4
a3k4ra
a2k3rø
ak3sk
a6k1s
1ak3s2l2
ak4st
ak5ste
ak5stø
2akta
a4k1t
ak2t1ek
a1ku
a3kø
ak1ån5
a1la
a2l1a1b2
ala6d4s
ala1d
al2a1ge
al3a3me
al2a2m
ala4n1d4
a2l1a2n1v
al1a2r1t
ala5sk
ala1s
2ala1t
1albu2m
a2l1b2
2al3di
a2l1d
al2d5r2
al6d4s
ale5s4p4
a1le
ale2s
ale3tu
al1eur
aleu1
al2gl
a2l1g
al2g3r4
al2gu2d
al1gu
al3k1l2
a2l1k
al4kla
al6k3s
alle4r2un
al1l
al3l2e
alle1ru
alle2rø1v
alle1rø
all2e2t2r4
2al3li
2ally3
2al1lø
a1lo
al1o1b2
a3l2og
a2l1o2p
al1or
al2o3ri
a2l1o1v
alo3ve2
al4sin
a2l1s
al3si
als2k4ro
alsk2r4
als2kø
al4sl2
al3s3la
al3s1n4
al4st2r4
al3st
al4stø
al2s3v2
al7sæ
1altan
a2l1t
al3t2h4
al3ti
al2t3v
a1lu
a2l1u2d
al1un
al1ur
a3lu2s
al4v2a
a2l2v
al4v5s2
a3ly
2a1læ
al1år
2a2m
4a6m.
3amag
a3ma
a5mak
a5m2a3ra
am2b3l2
a2m1b2
ame6n4s
a3me
a5men
ame3ra
am2er
ame3ru
ame1u1
3am3fe
a2m1f
ami2e
a3mi
am2i4ni
3a5m2o1s
a3mo
am1o3ve
a2mo1v4
am2pha
a2m1p
amp2h4
am2p2l2
3am5pu
am4sta
a6m1s
am3st
ams2t2r4
am6sæ
3a1m6t1m2
a2m1t
a4mu2d
a3mu
a4m1æ
a5m2ø
a3må
a1n2a
2a3n2a.
a2n3ak
a4n3a2l1f
ana6n5s
a2n3a4r1m
a5na1t
ana2ta
2an6d.
a4n1d
and2a6d.
an2d1a1d
an3dag
and1an
an2d1a1p
an4d1e2g1n
an3de
ande1g
and1e1je
and3e6k1s
and2ek
and1er3st
ande4r1s
2an7d2et
an3d2r2
and4ra1s
an3dra
and4re
an5d3ry
2an6d2s
and4s1k2r4
and3sk4
and4sky
and4s3tin
and3st
2andu
an2dur
an2d1ær
an2d5ø.
an6d3ø2s
a5n6e.
a1ne
a3ne1ri
an1e2r3k2
ane4r2o1v
ane1ro
an1eur
aneu1
2an4g.
a2ng
an2g1ag
an1ga
an2gar
2an1ge
an2g1l
1an1g2r4
ang5sk
an2g4s1
ang7ster
angs2te
ang3st
2an1gu
a3n2i
ani4a1s
a3ni3a
ani1e2l1s
a3nie
1ani1m
2anin
ani3s2t
ani1s
2a2n3j
1an1kl2
a2n1k
an3k1n2
an2k3r4
an2k2v
1a2n3l
1an3me
a2n3m
1an1no
a2n1n2
2a1no
a3nog
an2ol
4a4no4r1g
a2n1o1ri
an1o3s2t
a3no1s
1an3pa
a4n1p
2an6s.
a6n2s
1an5s2ig
an3si
an4s2il
an3s2k
an4s1ka1p
an4sor
an3so
an4sto
an3st
ans1tor
an6stra
an5st2r4
1anstæ
1an3s2v2
1an5sæ
1an3sø
4ante.
a2n1t
1an2t1v
4an2t2z
an2tø
anv2a4
a2n1v
2an1z
1a1næ
a1o
ao1s1
ao2sk2r4
aos2k
ao4s3t2
ao3ve2
ao1v
a4pe6n.
a1p
a3pe
a5pe2t
a2p3ho
ap2h4
api2r1a
ap2ir
a4p1j
ap3li
ap2l2
1ap3pa
a2p5p4
ap4sti
a2p1s
ap3st
apu5s
a3pu
a2pø
a2q2
a3qu4
2a6r.
2a3ra
a5r2a.
a5r2a2f
a5r2a1t
1a4r3b2
2ar3by
2arbø
2a2r1c2
ar4dek
a2r1d
ar3de
2ar5d2i
ar2d1o2m5
3are1a
a1re
2are1d
a2r1e6k4s
ar1e4k1t
ar2el
ar2e2m
ar2en
2a3rer2
ar2e1t2r4
6are1v
a4r3g2
2a1ri
ari2e
ari4stu
ari1s
ari3st
3arki1t
a2r1k
ark2i
1arki1v
ar2k1l2
3arkæ
ar5mel
a4r1m
ar3me
ar4m1i
2ar3mu
2armø
ar3n2a
a4r1n
ar6n4s
a1ro
a2r1o2p
aro2q2
ar2p2h4
a2r1p
ar4p3l2
ar2s2c2
a4r1s
ar4si
ar2s3k2ok
ars2ko
ar2s1k2r4
ar2s3l2
ar2sor
ar2s2v2
ar4s1ø
ar5te
a2r1t
2arte.
ar3tho
ar2t2h4
ar3t3hu
ar2to2p
2art4r4
a1ru
2a3r2y
a1ræ
a1rø
a1rå
a5sa
a1s
as1ag
a7s2ak
as1al
a4s2ar
a5s4c2
1ase1d
a5s2e
ase1r2i
1aset
a2s2h4
a3she
a4sh5v
a2sk2j
a4s1k4l2
ask5lo
as2ko
a4s4k2v
a2s3kø2d
as1kø
a4s3l2
4a2s5m
a5so
a3s4p4
a5s6pe4r1s
as3pe
1asp2ir
a3spi
as5p1le
as3p2l2
as5p2r2
2as5s2e
a6s3s2
a4sta2f
a3st
a4stak
a4ste1g
aste3ro
aste1r2å
a1sto2s3
as2t2r4
a4st3re2m
as2t1re
a4stry
as2tu
a4s2t3v
a5sty
as1tør
a5s2u
a2s3v2
a4s1ø
a1t
at2e1g
a2t1ej
ate2ri1d
ate1ri
ate3r1o1v
ate1ro
ate4r3æ
a2t1e1v
a3t4hu5
at2h4
at2in
1a2t3l
2at1li
a2t1o1i
1at2o2m
a2t3ra1d
at2r4
a3t4r2e.
at1re
a3t4ri
atro1s3
a2t3rø
at4s1a
a6t2s
at7s2e
at8sej
at3s1h4
at4si
at4sj
ats3kel
at3sk
at3ske
at3s1o
at4s1te
at3st2
at7sto
at7st2r4
at5s1tæ
at5sø
4atu
a2t1u2d
a2tæ
at1æn
a3tø
2au
a2u6d.
au2d
au3d3r2
aue2n
au1e
au2g1l
au2g5s1
3auk
au2m4
a1u4n1d
aun7s4t
a2u6n4s2
au3r
a2u5ru
au3s3c2
au2s
aus2k
au5stu
au3st
3au3t
2avak
a1v
av2a
ave3da
a3ve
ave1d
av1e4d5d2
a5ve4n1d
ave3ri
ave3r1u2d
ave2ru
ave3rø
1avi1s
av2i
av2l6s1
a2v1l
avo1
a2v1o1v
2a4v2s
av4sk
av5ska
avs1k2r4
av4s1l2
av4s1o
av4s1ter
av3st
av5st2r4
avs5tu
av4s3ø
a2vu
avæ4r4s1
a3væ
a1w
a2wr
axi1
ax1
a1ya
1aya1t
a1y3de
ay1d
ay1o
a2y1s2
ay3sk
a2z
a1æ1
a1ø
á2
á3l
à1
ä2c2
ä2f
ä1g
ä1k
ä2l2s2
älsk3
ä2m
äm3me3
ä2m1m
än1ni5
ä2n1n2
ä6n4s
ä2s1l2
ä1s
â1
1b2
4b.
3ba
ba6d5s
ba1d
ba2g1i
b2a2g1l
b2a2go
b2a2g9s4
ba2l1er
ba1le
ba2lo
bal2s1k
ba2l1s
ban4d2r2
ba4n1d
ba3re
bar2k1a
ba2r1k
ba3ro
ba3s2h4
ba1s
ba4ston
ba3st
ba2t3r4
ba1t
4b5b2
2b1c2
2b3d
b5dy1r4
5be
be2a1t
be1a
be3ate2
be1d2
be3d1å
be2e2
be3gl
be1g
be2lag
be1la
be2lor
be1lo
be2lå
be2na
be3nak
be3na1v
ben6d4r2
be4n1d
ben1e4n1d
be1ne
b2e3no
be4no2f
be6n2s2
ben5st
be2nø
beo5s
b2e1o
be3ra1p
be1ra
ber1a3st
bera1s
be3ren
be1re
be2re3p
be2r1e3s2k
bere2s
be3r1o1v
be1ro
be1rå
be5s2i
be2s
bes2q2
be3s2t
be7stå
be3ta
be3te
be3t2v
b2e3t1w
2b3f
2b3g
2b3h4
3bi
bi6d5s
bi1d
bi1e6n2s
bi1er
bi3go
bi5ka
bi2lin
b2il
bi1li
bi2lu
bi1o
bi3o.
bi1s2
bi3s1h4
bj2
b1je2
2b3k2
bl2
3b4la
bla4de1v
bla1d
bla3de
ble3ru
b1le
blo3de2
blo1d
bl4ou4
b1lo1v4
blu2
bly3
b4lå
2b3m
6b7n
5bo
body5
bo1d
bo2ga
bo2gi
bo2g2r4
bo2i1s2
bo1i
bol2
b2o2l4d
bol2i2ga
bo3li
bo2l1s4
bo3ra
b2o4r1ak
bor4den
bo2r1d
bor3de
bo3ro
bo4r4s
bor6t5s2
b2o2r1t
bo1r2u
b2o3rø
bo1rå
bo2s2k
bo1s
bo4s5p4
bo2t2r4
bo1t
2b3p
3b4r4
bral3
bra2ng5
bra6n5s
bra1s2
bred3s2k4
b1re
bre1d
bre6d2s
b2r1f3
bru4d3e4n1d
b2r1u2d
br2u3d2e
br2æk5
4b1s1
b3s2a
b4s1a2f
b6s3a1t
bs3c2
b6s3ej
b5s2e
b1s3e4r1s
b4s5f
b3s2i
b7s2ke
b4s3k2l2
bs3ko
bs3li
b2sl2
b3s2lå
b3so
b4so2f
b2s3p4
b4st2
b6sta1s
b5s2ta1t
bs3t2il
bs2to2p
b5st2r4
b6stu
b4s3t1v
b3s2u
b6s3u2d
bs3v2
b4sø
2b3t
bu2c2
bu6d4s
bu2d
bu3e
bue5s2
bug5
bu2g4s1
bun6d4s
bu4n1d
bun2dur
bus2k2ar
bu2s
bu4s2k2l2
bu4so
bu6s3s4
bu4s1t2r4
bu3st
bu2t3r4
bu1t
bü1
2b3v
2b3w
3by
by2e.
by1e
b2y1s2
by3sk
by3s2p4
by1t3r4
b4z1
3bæ
bæ1h5
b2æ2k1
bæ3r2e
bø4r1n6
bør2s1k
bø4r1s
bør4st2r4
bør3st
bå4d1e4n1d
bå1d
bå3de
bå6d3s
1c2
2c.
ca4b5s1
ca1b2
ca2e
ca2l2i1ga
ca1li
candi4a
ca4n1d
can3di
ca2p1
ca4po
ca1s2
ca4s5pe
ca3s4p4
ca5sto
ca3st
cathe3
ca1t
cat2h4
2c3b2
2c3c2
cce8s3
cci4s
2c3d
cdo3
ce3d
2c3e2ng
c2e3no
c2en4si
ce6n2s
cen4st
5ce2n1t
3cer
ce3ra
ce3r2e
cere4s1
cer6n3s
ce4r1n
cers1k
ce4r1s
cer4s3ka
cer4t2h4
ce2r1t
cer2to
ce1rå
ce5sa
ce2s
1c2e4s2c2
ce4so
ce4stan
ces2ta
ce3st
ces2ti
ce3s6v2
3cet
2c3f
2c3g
c4h4
4c6h.
2ch5b2
2c2h5d2
3che
che3e
5che1f
che3ro
3ché
2ch5g
2c2h5h4
chi4a
2c2hl
3chlo
4c2h6m
4c2hn
4c2h5p
2c2h1s
4c2h5t
ch6ta
2ch5v
4c2hw
ci2d2r2
ci1d
1c2i3e4n2c2
ci2e4s
3ci2f
c2i3na
ci3na2l
2c3i4n1d
c2in5d2r2
c2i2ni
ci3no
c1in5st
ci6n2s
5c2ir
ci2s
ci4st2r4
ci3st
ci3t2h4
ci1t
c3j
4ck1
ck3a
ck3i
ck3j
c4kl2
c4k3n2
c4kol
c1ko
ck3r4
c6k1s2
1c2k2s4c2
ck3s1l2
ck5st
c3ku
c4ku2p
c1k5v
2c6l.
c4la1v
cle1i
c1le
2c3m
2c3n
co3d
co1l2o
co6n5s
co3ri
co1ru
co3ry
5co1s
5cou
5co1v
2c3p
2c3q2
cr2
cre1a4
c1re
cro1s4
2c3s
2c3t
3cu1
cu2a
cu2en
cu1e
cu6m3s
cu2m
3cy1
c2y5s2
c4z
cæ5
cæ1s4
1d
6d.
3da.
2d1a1d
3d2a3di
5d2a2d5l
3dado
3da1e
2d1a2f
dag1e3le
d2agel
da1ge
dage4s
da2gi
2d1a2gt
d2ag1te
4d1ag1ti
3d4a1h4
da2i
2d1a2ir
2d1a6k1s
2d1aktu
da4k1t
2d1alar
da1la
2d3a2l1d
3dal1l
dal2s2c2
da2l1s
2d1a2l2v
2da4n1d
d3an6d.
dan5di
da3ni4a
da3n2i
2d1a2n3l
2d3a1no
2d1an3s2v2
da6n2s
d1anta
da2n1t
d2ante
dan6t2s2
4d1a4r3b2
dar6d2s4
1da2r1d
2d3are1a
da1re
2d1a2r3r2
da4r1s2
2d1a2r1t
3da1s
da3s2h4
da4s5p4
data3
da1t
da2te.
da2t1ek
dato3
da6t2s4
dat3s3v2
2d3au3t
d2au
2d1a2v1l
da1v
3day
2d1b2
d5bl2
dbog6
d5bo
1dbå4n1d6
2d1c2
4d5d2
ddag8
dd2a2g4s3
dde2la
d3de
ddy5
3de
5de.
1de3d6
de3e
4d5e2f1t
de1f
de3gl
de1g
de1i
5d2e2j.
de3k1n2
de1k4r4
d1e6k1s
4d3ek3si
4d3ek2s3p4
dek4st
de2lak
de1la
4d1ele2m
de1le
de2lo
del2s2c2
de2l1s
del4s2i
del2sk
dels1k2r4
del4s3l2
del2s5m
del4st
dels1ti
del2s3v2
de3lu
de2lå
4d1ema4l1j
de2m
de3ma
4d1e2m1b2
de5m2e
d1e2m1f
de5mi3
demi1e
5de6n.
de2n3a2m
de1na
d1enden
1de4n1d
den3de
4d1en6d1t
5de1ne
6d1ene4r1g
de2n1eu1
4den4g.
de2ng
4d1en1g2e
4den2g4s1
5d2e3no
5de6n2s
den4sk2i
den3sk
den4st
den4s1ti
den6s1u
d2en6t.
de2n1t
dente2
den2tek
2d1entu
